Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-470.02
Interactive wireless communication device, defined.

Interactive wireless communication device means any wireless electronic communication device that provides for voice or data communication between two or more parties, including, but not limited to, a mobile or cellular telephone, a text messaging device, a personal digital assistant that sends or receives messages, an audio-video player that sends or receives messages, or a laptop computer.

Laws 2007, LB415, § 3.